spa/src/Affixes.lexc
LEXICON VRoot
(-e)	Var;
(-iz)	Var;
(abalanzado)	Vzero;
(abaldon)	Var;
(abaldonado)	Vzero;
(abanderiz)	Var;
(abandon)	Var;
(abarc)	Var;
(abarquill)	Var;
(abastecerse)	Vzero;
(abañ)	Var;
(abdic)	Var;
(abigarr)	Var;
(abit)	Var;
(abland)	Var;
(ablaque)	Var;
(abneg)	Var;
(aboc)	Var;
(abog)	Var;
(abol)	Vir;
(aboll)	Var;
(abordado)	Vzero;
(aborrec)	Ver;
(abotag)	Var;
(abotarg)	Var;
(abotargarse)	Vzero;
(aboved)	Var;
(abr)	Vir;
(abrasado)	Vzero;
(abrev)	Var;
(abrevi)	Var;
(abrig)	Var;
(abrillant)	Var;
(abrum)	Var;
(absorb)	Ver;
(absten)	Ver;
(absterg)	Ver;
(abstra)	Ver;
(abund)	Var;
(aburgues)	Var;
(aburr)	Vir;
(acampan)	Var;
(acantil)	Var;
(acapar)	Var;
(acaparado)	Vzero;
(acarton)	Var;
(acastill)	Var;
(acatado)	Vzero;
(acebad)	Var;
(acech)	Var;
(aceler)	Var;
(acentu)	Var;
(acentuada)	Vzero;
(acept)	Var;
(aceptado)	Vzero;
(acerc)	Var;
(acerroj)	Var;
(acetific)	Var;
(acez)	Var;
(achac)	Var;
(achat)	Var;
(achic)	Var;
(achuch)	Var;
(acical)	Var;
(acidul)	Var;
(aclam)	Var;
(aclar)	Var;
(aclimat)	Var;
(acoce)	Var;
(acod)	Var;
(acoder)	Var;
(acogombr)	Var;
(acojin)	Var;
(acoll)	Var;
(acomod)	Var;
(acompas)	Var;
(acompañ)	Var;
(acongoj)	Var;
(acopi)	Var;
(acopl)	Var;
(acoquin)	Var;
(acoraz)	Var;
(acorcharse)	Vzero;
(acord)	Var;
(acorr)	Ver;
(acorral)	Var;
(acos)	Var;
(acot)	Var;
(acoyunt)	Var;
(acre)	Ver;
(acrec)	Ver;
(acrib)	Var;
(acrisolado)	Vzero;
(acristal)	Var;
(actu)	Var;
(acuartel)	Var;
(acuatiz)	Var;
(acuciado)	Vzero;
(acud)	Vir;
(acuitada)	Vzero;
(acumul)	Var;
(acurruc)	Var;
(acus)	Var;
(adamada)	Vzero;
(adapt)	Var;
(adecen)	Var;
(adecent)	Var;
(adecu)	Var;
(adehes)	Var;
(adeliñ)	Var;
(adestr)	Var;
(adher)	Vir;
(adherido)	Vzero;
(adiuvō)	Vzero;
(adjetiv)	Var;
(adjetivado)	Vzero;
(adjudic)	Var;
(adjur)	Var;
(admir)	Var;
(admit)	Vir;
(adob)	Var;
(adocen)	Var;
(adopt)	Var;
(ador)	Var;
(adorm)	Vir;
(adormec)	Ver;
(adormil)	Var;
(adorn)	Var;
(ados)	Var;
(adquir)	Vir;
(adriz)	Var;
(adsorb)	Ver;
(adul)	Var;
(adulter)	Var;
(adven)	Vir;
(advenido)	Vzero;
(adver)	Var;
(advert)	Vir;
(advertida)	Vzero;
(advertido)	Vzero;
(afan)	Var;
(afe)	Var;
(afect)	Var;
(afeit)	Var;
(afemin)	Var;
(aferrado)	Vzero;
(afi)	Var;
(afiebr)	Var;
(afij)	Var;
(afil)	Var;
(afinado)	Vzero;
(afincado)	Vzero;
(afirm)	Var;
(afirmado)	Vzero;
(afirmarse)	Vzero;
(afiuci)	Var;
(aflig)	Vir;
(aflu)	Vir;
(aforr)	Var;
(afrail)	Var;
(afront)	Var;
(afuci)	Var;
(afuf)	Var;
(agach)	Var;
(agandall)	Var;
(aganday)	Var;
(agarraf)	Var;
(agarroch)	Var;
(agavill)	Var;
(agigant)	Var;
(agit)	Var;
(aglomer)	Var;
(aglutin)	Var;
(agobi)	Var;
(agobia)	Vzero;
(agolp)	Var;
(agoniz)	Var;
(agor)	Var;
(agot)	Var;
(agraci)	Var;
(agrad)	Var;
(agrand)	Var;
(agrav)	Var;
(agrava)	Vzero;
(agravi)	Var;
(agreg)	Var;
(agremi)	Var;
(agrup)	Var;
(aguant)	Var;
(aguerr)	Vir;
(aguis)	Var;
(agusan)	Var;
(aguz)	Var;
(agüitarse)	Vzero;
(ahech)	Var;
(aherroj)	Var;
(ahij)	Var;
(ahinc)	Var;
(ahog)	Var;
(ahorquill)	Var;
(ahoy)	Var;
(ahuch)	Var;
(ahuci)	Var;
(ahus)	Var;
(ahuyent)	Var;
(air)	Var;
(ajardin)	Var;
(ajen)	Var;
(ajetre)	Var;
(ajob)	Var;
(ajor)	Var;
(alab)	Var;
(alance)	Var;
(alarma)	Vzero;
(alberg)	Var;
(alborot)	Var;
(alcalific)	Var;
(alcaliz)	Var;
(alcanz)	Var;
(aldabe)	Var;
(aleccion)	Var;
(aleg)	Var;
(alegado)	Vzero;
(alegoriz)	Var;
(alel)	Var;
(alent)	Var;
(alentarse)	Vzero;
(alerta)	Vzero;
(aletarg)	Var;
(alevantado)	Vzero;
(alforj)	Var;
(ali)	Var;
(alien)	Var;
(alig)	Var;
(aliger)	Var;
(alij)	Var;
(alind)	Var;
(aline)	Var;
(alivi)	Var;
(aliñ)	Var;
(allan)	Var;
(aloc)	Var;
(alog)	Var;
(aloj)	Var;
(along)	Var;
(alquil)	Var;
(alquilado)	Vzero;
(alter)	Var;
(alterc)	Var;
(altern)	Var;
(alternado)	Vzero;
(alucin)	Var;
(alud)	Vir;
(alumbr)	Var;
(alz)	Var;
(am)	Var;
(amaestr)	Var;
(amag)	Var;
(amanceb)	Var;
(amancebarse)	Vzero;
(amans)	Var;
(amanzan)	Var;
(amar)	Var;
(amarg)	Var;
(amaricon)	Var;
(amarr)	Var;
(amartiz)	Var;
(amat)	Var;
(amañ)	Var;
(ambl)	Var;
(ambul)	Var;
(amedrent)	Var;
(amengu)	Var;
(ametrall)	Var;
(amilan)	Var;
(amist)	Var;
(amobl)	Var;
(amohin)	Var;
(amojon)	Var;
(amol)	Var;
(amold)	Var;
(amoll)	Var;
(amollent)	Var;
(amonest)	Var;
(amonton)	Var;
(amordaz)	Var;
(amortaj)	Var;
(amortigu)	Var;
(amortiz)	Var;
(amosc)	Var;
(amotin)	Var;
(amotinarse)	Vzero;
(ampar)	Var;
(ampli)	Var;
(amplificado)	Vzero;
(amuebl)	Var;
(amugron)	Var;
(amur)	Var;
(and)	Var;
(aneg)	Var;
(angost)	Var;
(angusti)	Var;
(anhel)	Var;
(anid)	Var;
(anihil)	Var;
(anim)	Var;
(aniquil)	Var;
(anis)	Var;
(aniñ)	Var;
(anot)	Var;
(anticip)	Var;
(anticu)	Var;
(antolog)	Var;
(antuvi)	Var;
(anud)	Var;
(anul)	Var;
(anunci)	Var;
(aoj)	Var;
(apabull)	Var;
(apacent)	Var;
(apacigu)	Var;
(apag)	Var;
(apalanc)	Var;
(apale)	Var;
(apand)	Var;
(apantall)	Var;
(apapach)	Var;
(apar)	Vir;
(aparec)	Ver;
(aparej)	Var;
(apasion)	Var;
(apañ)	Var;
(ape)	Var;
(apel)	Var;
(apellid)	Var;
(apelmaz)	Var;
(apelotard)	Var;
(apeloton)	Var;
(aper)	Var;
(apetec)	Ver;
(apiadarse)	Vzero;
(apison)	Var;
(apiñ)	Var;
(aplan)	Var;
(aplatan)	Var;
(aplaud)	Vir;
(aplaz)	Var;
(aplic)	Var;
(aplom)	Var;
(apoc)	Var;
(apocarse)	Vzero;
(apod)	Var;
(apolill)	Var;
(aporc)	Var;
(aporre)	Var;
(aport)	Var;
(aposent)	Var;
(apostem)	Var;
(apoy)	Var;
(apreci)	Var;
(apreciado)	Vzero;
(apremi)	Var;
(aprend)	Ver;
(aprens)	Var;
(aprest)	Var;
(apret)	Var;
(apretuj)	Var;
(aprisc)	Var;
(aprision)	Var;
(aprob)	Var;
(apropi)	Var;
(aprovechado)	Vzero;
(aprovision)	Var;
(apuntal)	Var;
(apur)	Var;
(ar)	Var;
(arcaiz)	Var;
(ard)	Ver;
(arf)	Var;
(argument)	Var;
(argü)	Vir;
(arm)	Var;
(aromatiz)	Var;
(arraig)	Var;
(arrebañ)	Var;
(arrepentirse)	Vzero;
(arrest)	Var;
(arriesg)	Var;
(arrim)	Var;
(arrobado)	Vzero;
(arrog)	Var;
(arroj)	Var;
(arrull)	Var;
(articul)	Var;
(artill)	Var;
(as)	Var;
(as)	Vir;
(asac)	Var;
(ase)	Var;
(asech)	Var;
(asegur)	Var;
(aseguro)	Vzero;
(asent)	Vir;
(asfixiado)	Vzero;
(asibil)	Var;
(asign)	Var;
(asimil)	Var;
(asist)	Vir;
(asoci)	Var;
(asol)	Var;
(asole)	Var;
(asom)	Var;
(ason)	Var;
(aspir)	Var;
(ast)	Var;
(astil)	Var;
(asum)	Vir;
(asust)	Var;
(at)	Var;
(atabl)	Var;
(atac)	Var;
(atap)	Var;
(atarant)	Var;
(atañ)	Ver;
(atenaz)	Var;
(atend)	Ver;
(atent)	Var;
(atenu)	Var;
(ater)	Vir;
(aterraz)	Var;
(aterriz)	Var;
(aterroriz)	Var;
(atest)	Var;
(atez)	Var;
(atild)	Var;
(atisb)	Var;
(atiz)	Var;
(atoll)	Var;
(atont)	Var;
(ator)	Var;
(atornillado)	Vzero;
(atorr)	Var;
(atosig)	Var;
(atrac)	Var;
(atragant)	Var;
(atraill)	Var;
(atranc)	Var;
(atrap)	Var;
(atrev)	Ver;
(atribu)	Vir;
(atron)	Var;
(atropell)	Var;
(aturd)	Vir;
(atus)	Var;
(audit)	Var;
(audito)	Vzero;
(augur)	Var;
(aull)	Var;
(aument)	Var;
(auscult)	Var;
(ausent)	Var;
(autonomiz)	Var;
(autoriz)	Var;
(avanz)	Var;
(avasall)	Var;
(avecind)	Var;
(aven)	Var;
(avent)	Var;
(aventura)	Vzero;
(avergonz)	Var;
(averigu)	Var;
(averiguado)	Vzero;
(avis)	Var;
(avituall)	Var;
(aviv)	Var;
(ayud)	Var;
(ayunt)	Var;
(azuz)	Var;
(añad)	Vir;
(añadido)	Vzero;
(añud)	Var;
(bag)	Var;
(bail)	Var;
(bal)	Var;
(balbuc)	Vir;
(baldon)	Var;
(baleo)	Vzero;
(bambole)	Var;
(band)	Vir;
(banderilla)	Vzero;
(baqueta)	Vzero;
(barahust)	Var;
(baraj)	Var;
(barajust)	Var;
(barat)	Var;
(barb)	Var;
(barbull)	Var;
(bard)	Var;
(barr)	Ver;
(barrote)	Vzero;
(barrunt)	Var;
(bast)	Vir;
(basta)	Vzero;
(bastado)	Vzero;
(bastido)	Vzero;
(bat)	Vir;
(bautiz)	Var;
(bañ)	Var;
(beb)	Ver;
(besuc)	Var;
(besuque)	Var;
(bifurc)	Var;
(billete)	Vzero;
(birl)	Var;
(blande)	Var;
(blind)	Var;
(bloque)	Vzero;
(bog)	Var;
(boll)	Vir;
(bombarda)	Vzero;
(bord)	Var;
(borr)	Var;
(bostez)	Var;
(bot)	Var;
(botó)	Vzero;
(bram)	Var;
(braqui)	Var;
(brasa)	Vzero;
(brave)	Var;
(bre)	Var;
(brill)	Var;
(brot)	Var;
(broz)	Var;
(bruj)	Vir;
(brum)	Var;
(buf)	Var;
(bull)	Vir;
(burujón)	Vzero;
(busc)	Var;
(buscado)	Vzero;
(buz)	Var;
(ca)	Ver;
(cab)	Ver;
(cabalg)	Var;
(cabina)	Vzero;
(cablegrafi)	Var;
(cacare)	Var;
(cache)	Var;
(cag)	Var;
(calabri)	Var;
(calabrina)	Vzero;
(calafate)	Var;
(calc)	Var;
(calcin)	Var;
(calcul)	Var;
(calculado)	Vzero;
(calific)	Var;
(calificarse)	Vzero;
(call)	Var;
(callando)	Vzero;
(callant)	Var;
(calma)	Vzero;
(calmado)	Vzero;
(calosfriarse)	Vzero;
(calz)	Var;
(cambi)	Var;
(camel)	Var;
(camin)	Var;

LEXICON Prefixes
a-	VRoot;
ab-	VRoot;
aero-	VRoot;
ante-	VRoot;
auto-	VRoot;
bio-	VRoot;
ciber-	VRoot;
circun-	VRoot;
co-	VRoot;
com-	VRoot;
con-	VRoot;
contra-	VRoot;
crio-	VRoot;
de-	VRoot;
des-	VRoot;
di-	VRoot;
dis-	VRoot;
em-	VRoot;
en-	VRoot;
entre-	VRoot;
equi-	VRoot;
es-	VRoot;
extra-	VRoot;
foto-	VRoot;
geo-	VRoot;
in-	VRoot;
infra-	VRoot;
inter-	VRoot;
mal-	VRoot;
per-	VRoot;
pluri-	VRoot;
pre-	VRoot;
pro-	VRoot;
psico-	VRoot;
radio-	VRoot;
re-	VRoot;
res-	VRoot;
retro-	VRoot;
so-	VRoot;
sobre-	VRoot;
son-	VRoot;
sor-	VRoot;
sub-	VRoot;
super-	VRoot;
tele-	VRoot;
trans-	VRoot;
tras-	VRoot;
tri-	VRoot;
video-	VRoot;
